tests/runtime/integertests.sbl
// Test integer tests.
externals (stem)
routines (var_local_bug var_local_bug_)
integers (x y var_local_bug_a var_local_bug_b)
routines (recursive_var_local_bug recursive_var_local_bug_)
integers (recursive_x)
booleans (reentered)
define stem as (
  var_local_bug

  unset reentered
  test recursive_var_local_bug or fail='variable incorrectly localised into recursive routine'

  $x = len

  $x == 2 or fail='== failed (old style)'
  $(x == 2) or fail='== failed'
  $(2 == x) or fail='== failed (reversed)'

  $x != 3 or fail='!= failed (old style)'
  $(x != 3) or fail='!= failed'
  $(3 != x) or fail='!= failed (reversed)'

  $x >= 2 or fail='>= failed (old style)'
  $(x >= 2) or fail='>= failed'
  $(x >= 1) or fail='>= failed (nonequal)'
  $(2 >= x) or fail='>= failed (reversed)'
  $(3 >= x) or fail='>= failed (nonequal, reversed)'

  $x <= 2 or fail='<= failed (old style)'
  $(x <= 2) or fail='<= failed'
  $(x <= 3) or fail='<= failed (nonequal)'
  $(2 <= x) or fail='<= failed (reversed)'
  $(1 <= x) or fail='<= failed (nonequal, reversed)'

  $x > 1 or fail='> failed (old style)'
  $(x > 1) or fail='> failed'
  $(3 > x) or fail='> failed (nonequal, reversed)'

  $x < 3 or fail='< failed (old style)'
  $(x < 3) or fail='< failed'
  $(1 < x) or fail='< failed (reversed)'
)

// Regression test for bug in fixed in 3.1.1 - the variable localisation
// machinery failed to look at the rhs of integer tests.
define var_local_bug as (
  $var_local_bug_a = 0
  var_local_bug_
  $var_local_bug_a = 1
  var_local_bug_
)

define var_local_bug_ as (
  do (
    $(var_local_bug_a == 1)
    // The bug was that this use before set was not spotted.
    $(7 != var_local_bug_b)
    ['a'] delete
  )
  do (
    $(var_local_bug_a == 0)
    $var_local_bug_b = 7
  )
  $(7 == var_local_bug_b) or fail='var_local_bug_b was incorrectly localised'
)

define recursive_var_local_bug as (
  $recursive_x = 0
  reentered or (
    set reentered
    $recursive_x = 1
    recursive_var_local_bug_
    // `recursive_x` should get set back to 0 by the recursive call, but if it
    // gets localised it will still have value 1.
    $(recursive_x == 0)
  )
)

define recursive_var_local_bug_ as (
  recursive_var_local_bug
)
